California, session 20252026, AB148.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66023.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:66023.5. (a) As used in this section:(1) “Basic needs services and resources” includes, but is not limited to, housing, food, clothing, feminine hygiene, diapers, technology, childcare, and mental health services and resources.(2) “Coordinator” means a basic needs coordinator established pursuant to this section.(b) Each campus of the California Community Colleges shall do all of the following:(1) No later than July 1, 2022, establish the position of the Basic Needs Coordinator, and designate a staff person as the Basic Needs Coordinator to serve as the single point of contact for students experiencing basic needs insecurity related to basic needs services and resources. The coordinator shall act as a broker in identifying, supporting, and linking students to on- and off-campus housing, food, mental health, and other basic needs services and resources. To ensure the effectiveness and impact of this position, the coordinator shall be a dedicated position solely focused on addressing the basic needs of students and meet qualifications such as experience providing services to high-need and diverse populations. The coordinator shall oversee and coordinate with other staff tasked with addressing students’ basic needs, shall inform students of on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources and how to access them, and shall develop on- and off-campus partnerships to provide basic needs services and resources to their students.(2) (A) No later than July 1, 2022, establish a Basic Needs Center, which means a central location on campus where basic needs services, resources, and staff are made available to students. The Basic Needs Center is intended to be a one-stop, single location and point of contact for students to more easily access and gain awareness of basic needs services and resources. The campus shall make a reasonable effort to locate all on-campus basic needs services and resources at the Basic Needs Center. If the campus cannot reasonably locate all basic needs services or resources at the Basic Needs Center, the campus shall provide students with the location and contact information, including name, telephone number, and email address, for all basic needs services and resources not located in the Basic Needs Center. The coordinator shall be housed in the Basic Needs Center.(B) Each Basic Needs Center shall help ensure that students have the information they need to enroll in CalFresh, the California Earned Income Tax Credit (CalEITC), the Young Child Tax Credit (YCTC), the California Special Supplemental Food Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC), and other relevant government benefits programs. Each Basic Needs Center shall coordinate with their campus financial aid department or financial aid office. This section does not require nor encourage the Basic Needs Center to be combined or colocated with the financial aid department or financial aid office. The funding made available by the Budget Act of 2021 to implement this section, or any subsequent Budget Act or statute to implement this section, shall not be used to combine or colocate the Basic Needs Center with the financial aid department or financial aid office and shall not be used for the administration of student financial aid programs, including staffing. Each Basic Needs Center shall connect students to the financial aid department or financial aid office as appropriate to ensure that students are receiving all available financial aid. Each Basic Needs Center shall coordinate with their local homelessness response system to refer students to community resources available to address homelessness in addition to services and resources provided by the campus. Basic Needs Centers may provide support to students who can be reasonably expected to enroll in the upcoming term and to provide support to students during summer and winter breaks who were previously enrolled or are enrolled for the upcoming fall or spring term.(C) Campuses shall endeavor, to the extent feasible, to use a portion of any funds made available for basic needs support for providing funds directly to students to address urgent needs. To the extent that a Basic Needs Center is already in place, that center may be used to satisfy the requirements of this section. If the existing Basic Needs Center fulfills only part of the requirements of this section, basic needs services and resources shall be expanded as needed to satisfy all the requirements of this section.(3) (A) No later than February 1, 2022, develop a document that shall be provided to students at the Basic Needs Center, once established pursuant to paragraph (2), in either electronic format or paper form, and that shall be made available to students online, that clearly lists on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(i) The description of the service or resource.(ii) The location of where the service or resource is provided.(iii) The point of contact for the service or resource, including a name, telephone number, and email address.(iv) Any eligibility restrictions on accessing the service or resource.(B) On or before September 1, 2025, update the document developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) to include in the list of on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources the United States Department of Agriculture’s Food and Nutrition Service’s “SNAP Retail Locator” internet website link, which contains a map with locations that are authorized retail food stores under the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and accept the use of electronic benefits transfer cards issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10065) of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(C) Provide the document to students as a part of campus orientations in either electronic format or paper form.(D) Provide to faculty the online link to the electronic format of the document, the location of the Basic Needs Center, once established pursuant to paragraph (2), and the contact information for the coordinator, once designated pursuant to paragraph (1), and encourage faculty to include the online link to the electronic format of the document, the location of the Basic Needs Center, and the contact information for the coordinator in their syllabi.(E) To ensure that the document remains useful to students, the document shall be reviewed, updated, and made available online on both the internet website of the campus via the student basic needs tab and the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution, as specified in paragraph (6), no later than the first day of every fall and spring semester or no later than the first day of every fall and spring quarter.(4) No later than February 1, 2022, streamline the application and intake process for on-campus basic needs services and resources to minimize duplication and eliminate barriers to access. If an application is required, develop and use a single application for students to receive on-campus basic needs services and resources.(5) No later than February 1, 2022, develop and implement a plan to identify and provide outreach to students, including nontraditional students, who have basic needs insecurity related to housing, food, and mental health. Once the coordinator is designated pursuant to paragraph (1) and the Basic Needs Center is established pursuant to paragraph (2), the outreach shall include information about the coordinator and the Basic Needs Center.(6) No later than February 1, 2022, provide a student basic needs tab that is clearly visible and easily accessible from a drop-down menu on the home page of the campus’ internet website and include the information described in paragraph (3) conspicuously on both the internet website of the campus via the student basic needs tab and the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution. Once the coordinator is designated pursuant to paragraph (1) and the Basic Needs Center is established pursuant to paragraph (2), information about the coordinator and Basic Needs Center shall also be included on both the internet website of the campus via the student basic needs tab and the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution.(7) (A) For the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years, provide classified employees with access to food pantry services offered by the Basic Needs Center.(B) It is the intent of the Legislature to redirect funding in the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years from the Classified Community College Employee Summer Assistance Program established pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 88280) of Chapter 4 of Part 51 of Division 7 to support the activities described in subparagraph (A).(c) (1) Each campus of the California Community Colleges shall report to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges information that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) The description and number of basic needs services and resources, broken down by category.(B) The number of students served by the basic needs services and resources.(C) Any existing and available data regarding the socioeconomic and demographic backgrounds of these students.(D) Challenges and best practices in the implementation of the basic needs services and resources.(E) Whether students who used the basic needs services and resources remained enrolled or graduated from that campus.(F) The number of students who first started receiving CalFresh benefits in the previous year and the total number of students in the previous year who received CalFresh benefits, as provided by the State Department of Social Services.(G) Whether the campus has a data sharing agreement with the relevant county operating the CalFresh program for the purpose of identifying new, continuing, and returning students who are potentially eligible for CalFresh benefits, or efforts underway to enact such an agreement.(2) The data and information reported under this subdivision shall be disaggregated by each basic needs service and resource, where applicable.(3) Campuses are encouraged to collaborate with the State Department of Social Services to obtain the data identified in paragraph (1), as applicable.(4) The data and information reported by each campus of the California Community Colleges for the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years shall also include both of the following for the applicable reporting period:(A) The number of classified employees served pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b).(B) If appropriate, whether the use of food pantry services by classified employees pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) impacted resources available to students.(d) (1) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall develop and submit to the Governor and the Legislature every year beginning on or before May 1, 2023, a report based on the data and information reported by campuses pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) and information on the use of funds made available from the Budget Act of 2022 to implement this section.(2) A legislative report that includes the information required to be reported in this subdivision and submitted in any of the years required by paragraph (1) shall fulfill the reporting requirement pursuant to this subdivision to reduce duplicative efforts.(3) The reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) for the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years shall also include the data and information reported by campuses pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) for the appropriate reporting period.SEC. 1.5. Section 66023.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:66023.5. (a) As used in this section:(1) “Basic needs services and resources” includes, but is not limited to, housing, food, clothing, feminine hygiene, diapers, technology, childcare, and childcare services and resources, and mental health services and resources.(2) “Childcare services and resources” includes, but is not limited to, providing information on affordable childcare options on and near campus and information and connections to local resource and referral agencies in order to obtain support in applying to state and federal childcare subsidies and programs and finding local childcare providers, including, but not limited to, the California state preschool program, Head Start, the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) childcare program, and general child care and development programs. Childcare services and resources may also include direct financial support or service support.(2)(3) “Coordinator” means a basic needs coordinator established pursuant to this section.(b) Each campus of the California Community Colleges shall do all of the following:(1) No later than July 1, 2022, establish the position of the Basic Needs Coordinator, and designate a staff person as the Basic Needs Coordinator to serve as the single point of contact for students experiencing basic needs insecurity related to basic needs services and resources. The coordinator shall act as a broker in identifying, supporting, and linking students to on- and off-campus housing, food, mental health, and other basic needs services and resources. To ensure the effectiveness and impact of this position, the coordinator shall be a dedicated position solely focused on addressing the basic needs of students and meet qualifications such as experience providing services to high-need and diverse populations. The coordinator shall oversee and coordinate with other staff tasked with addressing students’ basic needs, shall inform students of on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources and how to access them, and shall develop on- and off-campus partnerships to provide basic needs services and resources to their students.(2) (A) No later than July 1, 2022, establish a Basic Needs Center, which means a central location on campus where basic needs services, resources, and staff are made available to students. The Basic Needs Center is intended to be a one-stop, single location and point of contact for students to more easily access and gain awareness of basic needs services and resources. The campus shall make a reasonable effort to locate all on-campus basic needs services and resources at the Basic Needs Center. If the campus cannot reasonably locate all basic needs services or resources at the Basic Needs Center, the campus shall provide students with the location and contact information, including name, telephone number, and email address, for all basic needs services and resources not located in the Basic Needs Center. The coordinator shall be housed in the Basic Needs Center.(B) Each Basic Needs Center shall help ensure that students have the information they need to enroll in CalFresh, the California Earned Income Tax Credit (CalEITC), the Young Child Tax Credit (YCTC), the California Special Supplemental Food Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC), and other relevant government benefits programs. If a campus has an existing center or office that supports parenting students and a student may be better served by that center or office, the Basic Needs Center may direct that student to the student parent center or office. Each Basic Needs Center shall coordinate with their campus financial aid department or financial aid office. This section does not require nor encourage the Basic Needs Center to be combined or colocated with the financial aid department or financial aid office. The funding made available by the Budget Act of 2021 to implement this section, or any subsequent Budget Act or statute to implement this section, shall not be used to combine or colocate the Basic Needs Center with the financial aid department or financial aid office and shall not be used for the administration of student financial aid programs, including staffing. Each Basic Needs Center shall connect students to the financial aid department or financial aid office office, as appropriate appropriate, to ensure that students are receiving all available financial aid. aid, including supplemental awards such as the awards for students with dependent children established pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42. Each Basic Needs Center shall coordinate with their local homelessness response system to refer students to community resources available to address homelessness in addition to services and resources provided by the campus. Basic Needs Centers may provide support to students who can be reasonably expected to enroll in the upcoming term and to provide support to students during summer and winter breaks who were previously enrolled or are enrolled for the upcoming fall or spring term.(C) Campuses shall endeavor, to the extent feasible, to use a portion of any funds made available for basic needs support for providing funds directly to students to address urgent needs. To the extent that a Basic Needs Center is already in place, that center may be used to satisfy the requirements of this section. If the existing Basic Needs Center fulfills only part of the requirements of this section, basic needs services and resources shall be expanded as needed to satisfy all the requirements of this section.(D) The childcare services and resources a Basic Needs Center may provide for parenting students includes, but is not limited to, direct financial or service support.(3) (A) No later than February 1, 2022, develop a document that shall be provided to students at the Basic Needs Center, once established pursuant to paragraph (2), in either electronic format or paper form, and that shall be made available to students online, that clearly lists on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(i) The description of the service or resource.(ii) The location of where the service or resource is provided.(iii) The point of contact for the service or resource, including a name, telephone number, and email address.(iv) Any eligibility restrictions on accessing the service or resource.(B) On or before September 1, 2025, update the document developed pursuant to subparagraph (A) to include in the list of on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources the United States Department of Agriculture’s Food and Nutrition Service’s “SNAP Retail Locator” internet website link, which contains a map with locations that are authorized retail food stores under the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and accept the use of electronic benefits transfer cards issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10065) of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(C) Provide the document to students as a part of campus orientations in either electronic format or paper form.(D) Provide to faculty the online link to the electronic format of the document, the location of the Basic Needs Center, once established pursuant to paragraph (2), and the contact information for the coordinator, once designated pursuant to paragraph (1), and encourage faculty to include the online link to the electronic format of the document, the location of the Basic Needs Center, and the contact information for the coordinator in their syllabi.(E) To ensure that the document remains useful to students, the document shall be reviewed, updated, and made available online on both the internet website of the campus via the student basic needs tab and the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution, as specified in paragraph (6), no later than the first day of every fall and spring semester or no later than the first day of every fall and spring quarter.(4) No later than February 1, 2022, streamline the application and intake process for on-campus basic needs services and resources to minimize duplication and eliminate barriers to access. If an application is required, develop and use a single application for students to receive on-campus basic needs services and resources.(5) No later than February 1, 2022, develop and implement a plan to identify and provide outreach to students, including nontraditional students, who have basic needs insecurity related to housing, food, and mental health. Once the coordinator is designated pursuant to paragraph (1) and the Basic Needs Center is established pursuant to paragraph (2), the outreach shall include information about the coordinator and the Basic Needs Center.(6) No later than February 1, 2022, provide a student basic needs tab that is clearly visible and easily accessible from a drop-down menu on the home page of the campus’ internet website and include the information described in paragraph (3) conspicuously on both the internet website of the campus via the student basic needs tab and the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution. Once the coordinator is designated pursuant to paragraph (1) and the Basic Needs Center is established pursuant to paragraph (2), information about the coordinator and Basic Needs Center shall also be included on both the internet website of the campus via the student basic needs tab and the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution.(7) (A) For the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years, provide classified employees with access to food pantry services offered by the Basic Needs Center.(B) It is the intent of the Legislature to redirect funding in the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years from the Classified Community College Employee Summer Assistance Program established pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 88280) of Chapter 4 of Part 51 of Division 7 to support the activities described in subparagraph (A). (c) (1) Each campus of the California Community Colleges shall report to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges information that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) The description and number of basic needs services and resources, broken down by category.(B) The number of students served by the basic needs services and resources.(C) Any existing and available data regarding the socioeconomic and demographic backgrounds of these students.(D) Challenges and best practices in the implementation of the basic needs services and resources.(E) Whether students who used the basic needs services and resources remained enrolled or graduated from that campus.(F) The number of students who first started receiving CalFresh benefits in the previous year and the total number of students in the previous year who received CalFresh benefits, as provided by the State Department of Social Services.(G) Whether the campus has a data sharing agreement with the relevant county operating the CalFresh program for the purpose of identifying new, continuing, and returning students who are potentially eligible for CalFresh benefits, or efforts underway to enact such an agreement.(2) The data and information reported under this subdivision shall be disaggregated by each basic needs service and resource, where applicable.(3) Campuses are encouraged to collaborate with the State Department of Social Services to obtain the data identified in paragraph (1), as applicable.(4) The data and information reported by each campus of the California Community Colleges for the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years shall also include both of the following for the applicable reporting period:(A) The number of classified employees served pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b).(B) If appropriate, whether the use of food pantry services by classified employees pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) impacted resources available to students. (d) (1) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall develop and submit to the Governor and the Legislature every year beginning on or before May 1, 2023, a report based on the data and information reported by campuses pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) and information on the use of funds made available from the Budget Act of 2022 to implement this section.(2) A legislative report that includes the information required to be reported in this subdivision and submitted in any of the years required by paragraph (1) shall fulfill the reporting requirement pursuant to this subdivision to reduce duplicative efforts.(3) The reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) for the 2026–27 and 2027–28 fiscal years shall also include the data and information reported by campuses pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) for the appropriate reporting period. SEC. 2. Section 66205.5 of the Education Code is amended to read:66205.5. (a) The California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, on or after October 1, 2025, begin work on all of the following:(1) (A) Establishing a model uniform set of academic standards for high school courses and college-level coursework taken for credit at a California public college or university by pupils simultaneously enrolled in high school, including career technical education courses pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 51220, for the purposes of recognition for admission to the California State University and to the University of California, respectively. In developing the model academic standards, the faculty of the postsecondary segments may work in consultation with administrators and faculty from schools maintaining kindergarten or any of grades kindergarten through 1 to 12, inclusive. Participating schools that maintain kindergarten or any of grades kindergarten through 12 1 to 12, inclusive, shall consult with an advisory group that shall include, but need not be limited to, representatives from all of the following:(i) The University of California and the California State University.(ii) Business and industry, related to career technical programs in kindergarten or any of grades kindergarten through 1 to 12, inclusive.(iii) Classroom teachers in career technical education.(iv) School administrators.(v) Parents.(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that the model academic standards provide clarity as to their applicability to a given course to ensure suitability for electronic transmission of coursework to and between California’s public education systems and CaliforniaColleges.edu.(C) It is the intent of the Legislature that high school pupils and individuals enrolled in adult education programs who are also enrolled in transfer-level community college courses for which they receive credit have those courses recognized for admissions purposes by the California State University and University of California.(2) Developing and implementing a speedy process whereby high schools may obtain approval of their courses to satisfy specified admissions requirements of the California State University and the University of California, respectively, by January 1, 2006. The approval process shall, by August 1 of each school year, notify applying schools whether the application for approval has been approved or denied.(3) Developing a simple procedure to evaluate a career technical education course submitted by a high school that identifies it as a duplicate of a course offered by another high school that is approved by and satisfies the admissions criteria of the California State University or the University of California. The procedure shall ensure that a duplicated course shall be approved as satisfying the admissions criteria of the California State University or the University of California, respectively, to the same extent as the original course if the review determines that the course successfully duplicates the content and requirements of the original course. If a course is not approved as a duplicate, the California State University or the University of California shall inform the applicant high school of the reasons why the course was not approved and shall provide the applicant with a specific list of requirements that the course must meet in order to be approved as a duplicate. In the event an applicant high school, whose course was not approved as a duplicate, revises the course and resubmits its application, the California State University or the University of California shall respond as expeditiously as possible so that if the course meets the necessary requirements for approval it may be offered in the next fall term.(4) Taking into consideration any previous work completed or policies adopted regarding matters related to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, by the California State University or the University of California, respectively.(5) Developing guidelines for high school computer science courses that may be approved for the purposes of recognition for admission, as provided in paragraph (1). For computer science courses determined to satisfy mathematics subject area requirements, the University of California is encouraged to ensure that these courses build upon fundamental mathematics content provided in courses that satisfy the requirements of subdivision (b).(6) Posting on its internet website the model uniform set of academic standards for the purpose of recognition for admission to the California State University and the University of California developed pursuant to paragraph (1).(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the academic standards for a high school course, adopted pursuant to and for purposes outlined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), are aligned with the standards developed pursuant to Section 60605.8.(c) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall post on its internet website the model uniform set of academic standards for college-level coursework taken for credit at a California public college or university for the purposes of recognition for admission to the California State University and the University of California developed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).SEC. 3. Section 70022 of the Education Code is amended to read:70022. (a) (1) Subject to an available and sufficient appropriation, an undergraduate student enrolled in the California State University or the University of California, or a community college student enrolled in upper division coursework of a community college baccalaureate program, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, who meets the requirements of paragraph (3) is eligible for a scholarship award as described in paragraph (2).(2) (A) For the 2013–14 to the 2021–22 academic year, inclusive, except as provided in paragraphs (4) and (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that, combined with other federal, state, or institutionally administered student grants or fee waivers received by an eligible student, is up to 40 percent of the amount charged to that student in that academic year for mandatory systemwide tuition and fees, or for an eligible community college student, up to 40 percent of the amount charged to that student in upper division fees for a community college baccalaureate degree program, if all of the requirements in paragraph (3) are met, to the satisfaction of the commission, each academic year.(B) For the 2022–23 academic year, except as provided in paragraph (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that equals the difference between their cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the sum of the following amounts:(i) Other federal, state, and institutionally administered student scholarships, grants, or fee waivers, and the amount of private scholarships awarded to the student in excess of the sum of the amounts in clauses (ii) and (iii).(ii) Seven thousand eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($7,898), reflecting an expected student contribution toward cost of attendance from work earnings or other resources.(iii) Notwithstanding Section 69506, for dependent students with an annual household income exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), 33 percent of the parents’ contribution from adjusted available income, as determined using the federal methodology established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087mm et seq.), and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.(C) For the 2023–24 academic year, except as provided in paragraph (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that equals the difference between their cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the sum of the following amounts:(i) Other federal, state, and institutionally administered student scholarships, grants, or fee waivers.(ii) The amount of private grants and scholarships awarded to the student, and institutionally awarded emergency housing funds and other basic needs emergency assistance awarded to the student, including emergency assistance awarded by an institution-based foster youth support program, in excess of the sum of the amounts in clauses (iii) and (iv).(iii) Seven thousand eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($7,898), reflecting an expected student contribution toward cost of attendance from work earnings or other resources.(iv) Notwithstanding Section 69506, for dependent students with an annual household income exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), 33 percent of the parents’ contribution from adjusted available income, as determined using the federal methodology established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087mm et seq.), and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.(D) Commencing with the 2024–25 academic year, except as provided in paragraph (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that equals the difference between their cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the sum of the following amounts:(i) Other federal, state, and institutionally administered student need-based scholarships, grants, or fee waivers.(ii) The amount of private grants and scholarships awarded to the student, and institutionally administered non-need-based scholarships and institutionally awarded emergency housing funds or other basic needs emergency assistance awarded to the student, including emergency assistance awarded by an institution-based foster youth support program, in excess of the sum of the amounts in clauses (iii) and (iv).(iii) An expected student contribution toward cost of attendance from work earnings or other resources. The commission shall adjust the 2023–24 amount of seven thousand eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($7,898) annually thereafter based on the percentage change in the minimum wage, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code.(iv) Notwithstanding Section 69506, for dependent students with an annual household income exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), 33 percent of the parents’ contribution from adjusted available income, as determined using the federal methodology established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087mm et seq.), and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.(E) If a student’s total award under this article, in combination with other grants and scholarships treated as estimated financial assistance (EFA) or other financial assistance (OFA) pursuant to federal financial aid regulations, exceeds the allowable gift aid under those regulations, the award under this article shall be reduced to the greatest allowable award to maintain compliance pursuant to federal financial aid regulations.(F) If an award in clause (i) of subparagraph (D) of less than three hundred dollars ($300) is identified following the determination of a student’s scholarship award under this article, the student’s scholarship award under this article shall not require a recalculation.(3) (A) A student shall be eligible to receive an award if all of the following requirements are met, to the satisfaction of the commission, each academic year:(B) (i) For each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, the student’s annual household income does not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). For awards distributed for the 2016–17 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum income level set under this clause in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII  B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, annual household income shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.(ii) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, the student’s annual household income does not exceed the following amounts:(I) Two hundred one thousand dollars ($201,000) if the student is a dependent student or an independent student with dependents other than a spouse.(II) One hundred thirty-three thousand dollars ($133,000) if the student is a married independent student with no dependents other than a spouse.(III) One hundred sixteen thousand dollars ($116,000) if the student is a single independent student with no dependents.(iii) For awards distributed for the 2023–24 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum income levels set under clause (ii) in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, annual household income shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.(C) (i) For each academic year from 2015–16 to 2021–22, inclusive, the student’s household asset level shall not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). For awards distributed in the 2016–17 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum household asset level set under this clause in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, student’s household asset level shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.(ii) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, the student’s household asset level does not exceed the following amounts:(I) Two hundred one thousand dollars ($201,000) if the student is a dependent student or an independent student with dependents other than a spouse.(II) Ninety-six thousand dollars ($96,000) if the student is a single independent student with no dependents or a married independent student with no dependents other than a spouse.(iii) For awards distributed in the 2023–24 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum household asset level set under clause (ii) in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, a student’s household asset level shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.(D) The student satisfies the eligibility requirements for a Cal Grant award pursuant to Section 69433.9, except that a student who is exempt from nonresident tuition under Section 68130.5 shall not be required to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.9.(E) The student is exempt from paying nonresident tuition.(F) The student completes and submits a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or a California Dream Act application. The FAFSA or California Dream Act application must be submitted or postmarked by no later than March 2.(G) The student makes a timely application or applications for all other federal, state, or institutionally administered grants or fee waivers for which the student is eligible.(H) The student maintains satisfactory academic progress in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 69432.7.(I) The student is pursuing the student’s first undergraduate baccalaureate degree or has completed a baccalaureate degree and has been admitted to, and is enrolled in, a program of professional teacher preparation at an institution approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.(J) The student is enrolled at least part time.(4) (A) For each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, the percentages specified in paragraph (2) shall be reduced by 0.6-percent increments per one thousand dollars ($1,000) of annual household income in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), to a minimum 10 percent, provided that no scholarship award shall be provided to a student with an annual household income exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). Beginning with award calculations for the 2016–17 academic year, and for subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the income levels specified in this subparagraph by the percentage change in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII  B of the California Constitution and shall adjust the incremental reduction accordingly to ensure that a minimum of 10 percent of mandatory systemwide tuition and fees for an academic year are awarded. This reduction shall be in addition to any reduction required by Section 70023.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, for any student who qualifies for a scholarship award of at least one dollar ($1), the minimum annual scholarship amount for full-time enrollment is ninety dollars ($90).(5) (A) For the 2014–15, 2015–16, and 2016–17 academic years, the maximum amount of a student’s scholarship award shall be 35 percent, 50 percent, and 75 percent, respectively, of the total scholarship award amount that the student would otherwise be eligible to receive.(B) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, except as provided in subparagraph (D), the maximum amount of a student’s scholarship award shall be determined by the percentage determined pursuant to subparagraph (C) of the total scholarship award amount that the student would otherwise be eligible to receive.(C) The commission shall annually determine the percentage required for purposes of subparagraph (B) by taking the amount appropriated for the purposes of this program for the applicable award year, less the amount necessary to fund subparagraph (D), and dividing that by the sum of the projected amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (B), (C), or (D) of paragraph (2) for the applicable award year for all eligible students, except those affected by subparagraph (D).(D) Commencing with the 2023–24 academic year, a current or former foster youth, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 69433.6, shall receive a scholarship award in the full amount determined in subparagraphs (C) or (D) of paragraph (2), as adjusted, if applicable, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).(b) In order for students enrolled in their respective segments to remain eligible to receive a scholarship award under this article, the University of California and the California State University shall not supplant their respective institutional need-based or merit-based grants with the funds provided for scholarships under this article. The University of California and the California State University shall ensure that the amount of institutional student aid provided in each academic year beginning with the 2022–23 academic year is adjusted annually to account for increases in systemwide undergraduate enrollment, as applicable, such that the proportion of institutional student aid relative to systemwide undergraduate enrollment is maintained at a level at least equivalent to the level maintained for undergraduate students during the 2021–22 academic year. The University of California and the California State University shall also ensure that at least 33 percent of the revenues of an increase to existing mandatory systemwide fees charged to undergraduate students is set aside by the regents or the trustees, as applicable, for institutional student aid to assist resident undergraduate students, including those undergraduate students exempt from nonresident tuition pursuant to Sections 68075.5 and 68130.5, and families in meeting the total cost of education.(c) (1) The University of California and the California State University shall report on the implementation of this article as part of the report made pursuant to Section 66021.1. At a minimum, the report shall add the following information, by parental income level or expected family contribution deciles, for the prior academic year:(A) The number and percentage of students receiving an award under this article and the average dollar amount of that award.(B) The number and percentage of students receiving a student loan and the average amount borrowed.(2) The report shall also include the following information by campus for the prior academic year:(A) The cost of attendance for undergraduates in each living arrangement (on campus, off campus, or at home with parents).(B) The number and percentage of undergraduates in each living arrangement (on campus, off campus, or at home with parents).(d) (1) A Middle Class Scholarship Program award authorized pursuant to this article shall be defined as a full-time equivalent grant. An award to a part-time student shall be a fraction of a full-time grant. For each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, an award to a part-time student shall be determined by the proportionate amount charged for systemwide tuition and fees. A part-time student shall not be discriminated against in the selection of Middle Class Scholarship Program awards. For purposes of this section, “full-time student” and “part-time student” have the same meaning as specified in subdivision (f) of Section 69432.7.(2) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, an award to a student enrolled in six to eight semester units, inclusive, or the equivalent shall be no more than one-half of the award the student would have received had the student enrolled full time. An award to a student enrolled in 9 to 11 semester units, inclusive, or the equivalent shall be no more than three-quarters of the award the student would have received had the student enrolled full time.SEC. 3.5. Section 70022 of the Education Code is amended to read:70022. (a) (1) Subject to an available and sufficient appropriation, an undergraduate student enrolled in the California State University or the University of California, or a community college student enrolled in upper division coursework of a community college baccalaureate program, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, who meets the requirements of paragraph (3) is eligible for a scholarship award as described in paragraph (2).(2) (A) For the 2013–14 to the 2021–22 academic year, inclusive, except as provided in paragraphs (4) and (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that, combined with other federal, state, or institutionally administered student grants or fee waivers received by an eligible student, is up to 40 percent of the amount charged to that student in that academic year for mandatory systemwide tuition and fees, or for an eligible community college student, up to 40 percent of the amount charged to that student in upper division fees for a community college baccalaureate degree program, if all of the requirements in paragraph (3) are met, to the satisfaction of the commission, each academic year.(B) For the 2022–23 academic year, except as provided in paragraph (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that equals the difference between their cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the sum of the following amounts:(i) Other federal, state, and institutionally administered student scholarships, grants, or fee waivers, and the amount of private scholarships awarded to the student in excess of the sum of the amounts in clauses (ii) and (iii).(ii) Seven thousand eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($7,898), reflecting an expected student contribution toward cost of attendance from work earnings or other resources.(iii) Notwithstanding Section 69506, for dependent students with an annual household income exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), 33 percent of the parents’ contribution from adjusted available income, as determined using the federal methodology established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087mm et seq.), and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.(C) For the 2023–24 academic year, except as provided in paragraph (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that equals the difference between their cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the sum of the following amounts:(i) Other federal, state, and institutionally administered student scholarships, grants, or fee waivers.(ii) The amount of private grants and scholarships awarded to the student, and institutionally awarded emergency housing funds and other basic needs emergency assistance awarded to the student, including emergency assistance awarded by an institution-based foster youth support program, in excess of the sum of the amounts in clauses (iii) and (iv).(iii) Seven thousand eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($7,898), reflecting an expected student contribution toward cost of attendance from work earnings or other resources.(iv) Notwithstanding Section 69506, for dependent students with an annual household income exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), 33 percent of the parents’ contribution from adjusted available income, as determined using the federal methodology established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087mm et seq.), and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.(D) Commencing with the 2024–25 academic year, except as provided in paragraph (5), an eligible student shall receive a scholarship award in an amount that equals the difference between their cost of attendance as determined by the commission and the sum of the following amounts:(i) Other federal, state, and institutionally administered student need-based scholarships, grants, or fee waivers.(ii) The amount of private grants and scholarships awarded to the student, and institutionally administered non-need-based scholarships and institutionally awarded emergency housing funds or other basic needs emergency assistance awarded to the student, including emergency assistance awarded by an institution-based foster youth support program, in excess of the sum of the amounts in clauses (iii) and (iv).(iii) An expected student contribution toward cost of attendance from work earnings or other resources. The commission shall adjust the 2023–24 amount of seven thousand eight hundred ninety-eight dollars ($7,898) annually thereafter based on the percentage change in the minimum wage, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code.(iv) Notwithstanding Section 69506, for dependent students with an annual household income exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), 33 percent of the parents’ contribution from adjusted available income, as determined using the federal methodology established by Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087mm et seq.), and applicable rules and regulations adopted by the commission.(E) If a student’s total award under this article, in combination with other grants and scholarships treated as estimated financial assistance (EFA) or other financial assistance (OFA) pursuant to federal financial aid regulations, exceeds the allowable gift aid under those regulations, the award under this article shall be reduced to the greatest allowable award to maintain compliance pursuant to federal financial aid regulations.(F) If an award in clause (i) of subparagraph (D) of less than three hundred dollars ($300) is identified following the determination of a student’s scholarship award under this article, the student’s scholarship award under this article shall not require a recalculation. (3) (A) A student shall be eligible to receive an award if all of the following requirements are met, to the satisfaction of the commission, each academic year:(B) (i) For each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, the student’s annual household income does not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). For awards distributed for the 2016–17 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum income level set under this clause in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII  B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, annual household income shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.(ii) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, the student’s annual household income does not exceed the following amounts:(I) Two hundred one thousand dollars ($201,000) if the student is a dependent student or an independent student with dependents other than a spouse.(II) One hundred thirty-three thousand dollars ($133,000) if the student is a married independent student with no dependents other than a spouse.(III) One hundred sixteen thousand dollars ($116,000) if the student is a single independent student with no dependents.(iii) For awards distributed for the 2023–24 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum income levels set under clause (ii) in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, annual household income shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.(C) (i) For each academic year from 2015–16 to 2021–22, inclusive, the student’s household asset level shall not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). For awards distributed in the 2016–17 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum household asset level set under this clause in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, student’s household asset level shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.(ii) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, the student’s household asset level does not exceed the following amounts:(I) Two hundred one thousand dollars ($201,000) if the student is a dependent student or an independent student with dependents other than a spouse.(II) Ninety-six thousand dollars ($96,000) if the student is a single independent student with no dependents or a married independent student with no dependents other than a spouse.(iii) For awards distributed in the 2023–24 academic year and subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the maximum household asset level set under clause (ii) in accordance with the percentage changes in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution. For purposes of this article, a student’s household asset level shall be calculated in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program (Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430)) and Section 69506.(D) The student satisfies the eligibility requirements for a Cal Grant award pursuant to either subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 69433.9, except that a student who is exempt from nonresident tuition under Section 68130.5 shall not be required to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.9.(E) The student is exempt from paying nonresident tuition.(F) The student completes and submits a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or a California Dream Act application. The FAFSA or California Dream Act application must be submitted or postmarked by no later than March 2.(G) The student makes a timely application or applications for all other federal, state, or institutionally administered grants or fee waivers for which the student is eligible.(H) The student maintains satisfactory academic progress in a manner that is consistent with the requirements applicable to the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 69432.7.(I) The student is pursuing the student’s first undergraduate baccalaureate degree or has completed a baccalaureate degree and has been admitted to, and is enrolled in, a program of professional teacher preparation at an institution approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.(J) The student is enrolled at least part time.(4) (A) For each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, the percentages specified in paragraph (2) shall be reduced by 0.6-percent increments per one thousand dollars ($1,000) of annual household income in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), to a minimum 10 percent, provided that no scholarship award shall be provided to a student with an annual household income exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000). Beginning with award calculations for the 2016–17 academic year, and for subsequent academic years, the commission shall annually adjust the income levels specified in this subparagraph by the percentage change in the cost of living within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 8 of Article XIII  B of the California Constitution and shall adjust the incremental reduction accordingly to ensure that a minimum of 10 percent of mandatory systemwide tuition and fees for an academic year are awarded. This reduction shall be in addition to any reduction required by Section 70023.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), for each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, for any student who qualifies for a scholarship award of at least one dollar ($1), the minimum annual scholarship amount for full-time enrollment is ninety dollars ($90).(5) (A) For the 2014–15, 2015–16, and 2016–17 academic years, the maximum amount of a student’s scholarship award shall be 35 percent, 50 percent, and 75 percent, respectively, of the total scholarship award amount that the student would otherwise be eligible to receive.(B) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, except as provided in subparagraph (D), the maximum amount of a student’s scholarship award shall be determined by the percentage determined pursuant to subparagraph (C) of the total scholarship award amount that the student would otherwise be eligible to receive.(C) The commission shall annually determine the percentage required for purposes of subparagraph (B) by taking the amount appropriated for the purposes of this program for the applicable award year, less the amount necessary to fund subparagraph (D), and dividing that by the sum of the projected amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (B), (C), or (D) of paragraph (2) for the applicable award year for all eligible students, except those affected by subparagraph (D).(D) Commencing with the 2023–24 academic year, a current or former foster youth, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 69433.6, shall receive a scholarship award in the full amount determined in subparagraphs (C) or (D) of paragraph (2), as adjusted, if applicable, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).(b) In order for students enrolled in their respective segments to remain eligible to receive a scholarship award under this article, the University of California and the California State University shall not supplant their respective institutional need-based or merit-based grants with the funds provided for scholarships under this article. The University of California and the California State University shall ensure that the amount of institutional student aid provided in each academic year beginning with the 2022–23 academic year is adjusted annually to account for increases in systemwide undergraduate enrollment, as applicable, such that the proportion of institutional student aid relative to systemwide undergraduate enrollment is maintained at a level at least equivalent to the level maintained for undergraduate students during the 2021–22 academic year. The University of California and the California State University shall also ensure that at least 33 percent of the revenues of an increase to existing mandatory systemwide fees charged to undergraduate students is set aside by the regents or the trustees, as applicable, for institutional student aid to assist resident undergraduate students, including those undergraduate students exempt from nonresident tuition pursuant to Sections 68075.5 and 68130.5, and families in meeting the total cost of education.(c) (1) The University of California and the California State University shall report on the implementation of this article as part of the report made pursuant to Section 66021.1. At a minimum, the report shall add the following information, by parental income level or expected family contribution deciles, for the prior academic year:(A) The number and percentage of students receiving an award under this article and the average dollar amount of that award.(B) The number and percentage of students receiving a student loan and the average amount borrowed.(2) The report shall also include the following information by campus for the prior academic year:(A) The cost of attendance for undergraduates in each living arrangement (on campus, off campus, or at home with parents).(B) The number and percentage of undergraduates in each living arrangement (on campus, off campus, or at home with parents).(d) (1) A Middle Class Scholarship Program award authorized pursuant to this article shall be defined as a full-time equivalent grant. An award to a part-time student shall be a fraction of a full-time grant. For each academic year from 2013–14 to 2021–22, inclusive, an award to a part-time student shall be determined by the proportionate amount charged for systemwide tuition and fees. A part-time student shall not be discriminated against in the selection of Middle Class Scholarship Program awards. For purposes of this section, “full-time student” and “part-time student” have the same meaning as specified in subdivision (f) of Section 69432.7.(2) Commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, an award to a student enrolled in six to eight semester units, inclusive, or the equivalent shall be no more than one-half of the award the student would have received had the student enrolled full time. An award to a student enrolled in 9 to 11 semester units, inclusive, or the equivalent shall be no more than three-quarters of the award the student would have received had the student enrolled full time.SEC. 4. Section 70023 of the Education Code is amended to read:70023. (a) For each academic year, the commission shall determine an amount sufficient, when combined with other federal, state, or institutionally administered student scholarships, grants, or fee waivers received by eligible students from other sources, to provide scholarships to eligible students in the amounts described in paragraphs (2), (4), and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 70022. The University of California, the California State University, and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall provide the commission with any financial aid data that are necessary to determine these amounts.(b) (1) The commission shall annually determine if the amounts appropriated under this section in each fiscal year are sufficient to cover the costs of the scholarships projected to be awarded pursuant to the program. If those amounts are not sufficient for this purpose, the scholarships shall be reduced proportionately by an equal percentage for all recipients of scholarships under this article. Commencing with the 2023–24 academic year, this reduction shall not apply to a scholarship award under this article for current or former foster youth described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 70022.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), commencing with the 2022–23 academic year, for any student who qualifies for a scholarship award under this article of at least one dollar ($1), the minimum annual scholarship amount for full-time enrollment shall be ninety dollars ($90).(c) (1) Each institution participating in the scholarship program under this article shall sign an institutional participation agreement with the commission acknowledging the institution’s willingness to administer the scholarship program pursuant to this article, Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations, and guidance developed by the commission. The institutional participation agreement shall be developed through collaboration and consultation between the commission and the office of the President of the University of California, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(c)(2) The commission may adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this article under subdivision (b) as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of those regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, any regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall not remain in effect more than 180 days unless the commission complies with all provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, as required by subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.(d) The unencumbered balance, as of June 30 of each fiscal year, of the amount appropriated from the Middle Class Scholarship Fund pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) shall revert to the General Fund.(e) (1) Upon order of the Director of Finance, the following amounts shall be transferred from the General Fund to the Middle Class Scholarship Fund, and are hereby appropriated to the commission for allocation pursuant to this article:(A) For the 2014–15 fiscal year, one hundred seven million dollars ($107,000,000).(B) For the 2015–16 fiscal year, eighty-two million dollars ($82,000,000).(C) For the 2016–17 fiscal year, seventy-one million two hundred forty-four thousand dollars ($71,244,000).(D) For the 2017–18 fiscal year, ninety-nine million nine hundred thirty-eight thousand dollars ($99,938,000).(E) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, one hundred four million three hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($104,345,000).(F) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, one hundred sixteen million five hundred fifty-seven thousand dollars ($116,557,000).(G) For the 2020–21 fiscal year, one hundred fourteen million one hundred seventy-one thousand dollars ($114,171,000).(H) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, one hundred nine million nine hundred sixty-one thousand dollars ($109,961,000).(2) An annual appropriation to the commission is hereby established in the amounts and for the fiscal years described in paragraph (1) to carry out the purposes of this section and Section 70022.(3) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, the annual appropriation to the commission to carry out the purposes of this section and Section 70022 shall be determined in the annual Budget Act.(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that any savings realized from changes made to the allocations under this subdivision by a bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill for the 2015–16 fiscal year shall be used to support higher education.(5) The funds transferred and appropriated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall only be available for encumbrance in the fiscal year in which they are transferred, and the General Fund shall have no liability or any obligation beyond the transfers explicitly authorized in paragraph (1) unless a subsequent transfer or allocation is required pursuant to statute.(6) In any fiscal year, additional appropriations may be enacted pursuant to statute to carry out the purposes of this article.(7) (A) Beginning with the Governor’s Budget proposal for the 2014–15 fiscal year, and in the Governor’s Budget proposal for each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of Finance shall include a fund condition statement for the Middle Class Scholarship Fund for the fiscal year of the proposed budget and the two immediately preceding fiscal years prepared in accordance with existing law.(B) Upon order of the Director of Finance and for the 2013–14 to 2021–22 fiscal years, inclusive, if the May Revision projects a budget deficit for the next fiscal year, the amount specified in paragraph (1) for the fiscal year for which the budget deficit is projected may be reduced by up to 33 percent.(f) Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for its purposes, the commission may begin implementation of, and establish outreach services relating to, this article.(g) The commission may adopt regulations it deems necessary for the implementation of this article. If the commission adopts regulations pursuant to this subdivision, the regulations may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). For purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.SEC. 5. Section 78052 of the Education Code is amended to read:78052. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that community college districts develop and implement zero-textbook-cost degrees and develop open educational resources for courses to reduce the overall cost of education for students and decrease the time it takes students to complete degree programs.(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings: definitions apply:(1) “Chancellor” means the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(2) “Chancellor’s office” means the Office office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.(3) “Degree” means a zero-textbook-cost degree.(4) “Open educational resources” means high-quality teaching, learning, and research resources that reside in the public domain or have been released pursuant to an intellectual property license that permits their free use and repurposing by others, and may include other resources that are legally available and free of cost to students. Open educational resources include, but are not limited to, full courses, course materials, modules, textbooks, faculty-created content, streaming videos, tests, software, and any other tools, materials, or techniques used to support access to knowledge.(5) “Zero-textbook-cost degrees” means community college associate degrees or career technical education certificates earned entirely by completing courses that eliminate conventional textbook costs by using alternative instructional materials and methodologies, including open educational resources. For purposes of this paragraph, “zero-textbook-cost degrees” may include a low-cost degree option if a no-cost equivalent option is not available or cannot be developed. Discretionary student printing of instructional materials shall not be considered a cost as part of this program.(c) Of the funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act to develop and implement degrees, the chancellor shall distribute grants of up to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to a community college district for each degree developed and implemented within the district that contributes to the overall elimination, or significant lowering, of textbook costs for students and aligns with the conditions for receipt of funds specified in subdivision (d). The chancellor’s office shall ensure that a grant does not result in the development or implementation of duplicate degrees for a subject matter to avoid duplication of effort and ensure the development and implementation of the greatest number of degrees for the benefit of the greatest number of students. The chancellor’s office may distribute the grants in phases, including a planning phase and an implementation phase.(d) As a condition of receiving funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act to develop and implement degrees, a community college district shall comply with all of the following:(1) Develop and implement one or more of the following program pathways:(A) An existing associate degree or career technical education certificate program, prioritizing existing associate degrees for transfer.(B) A new associate degree or career technical education certificate program that meets one of the following conditions:(i) Has a high value in the regional market.(ii) Meets an emerging regional business industry need.(iii) Has high textbook costs.(2) In complying with paragraph (1), prioritize the development and implementation of a degree from an existing associate degree for transfer and, to the extent possible, prioritize the adaptation of existing open educational resources through existing open educational resources initiatives, or elsewhere, before creating new content.(3) Develop degrees with consideration for sustainability after grant funding is exhausted, including how content is updated and presented.(4) Ensure compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act (Public Law 104-197) and the federal Copyright Act of 1976 (Public Law 94-553).(5) Develop and implement a minimum of one degree for each grant received.(6) Develop and implement a degree that other community college districts can use or adapt, and post each degree, and the contents of the degree, on the online clearinghouse of information established pursuant to Item 6870-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2016, or a successor internet website. All open educational resources used as learning materials for a degree developed pursuant to this section shall be added to the California Digital Open Source Library established in Section 66408. Testing and assessment materials posted online pursuant to this paragraph shall be safeguarded to maintain the integrity of those materials. This paragraph shall not be construed to prohibit faculty from providing sample test and assessment materials to students.(7) Ensure faculty shall have flexibility to update and customize degree content as necessary within the parameters of this program.(8) Ensure that the degree developed and implemented is clearly identified in college catalogs and in class schedules.(9) Provide the chancellor with all legislatively required report data, any planning, progress, and outcome information associated with the grant, and any additional information that the chancellor determines necessary.(10) Consult with the local academic senate of a college that would implement a degree.(11) (A) Use a multimember team approach, to develop and implement a degree pursuant to this section, that includes faculty, college administrators, and other content-focused staff, including, but not limited to, librarians, instructional designers, and technology experts, from the campus that would implement the degree, other colleges of the community college system, and interested campuses of the California State University and the University of California.(B) Grant recipients may use funds to obtain professional development and technical assistance to assist in the development of degrees. degrees and open educational resource materials.(12) Strive to implement degrees within three academic years of receiving funding, or sooner, as determined by the chancellor’s office.(e) Of the funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act, the chancellor may also distribute grants to a community college district for the development and curation of open educational resources for coursework. The chancellor’s office shall determine the amount of a grant for this purpose, but the grant amount shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).(f) As a condition of receiving funding appropriated in the annual Budget Act for the development and curation of open educational resources for coursework, a community college district shall comply with all of the following:(1) Coordinate the development and curation of open educational resources with efforts to develop and implement degrees pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).(2) In instances where the community college district does not receive a grant pursuant to subdivision (c), the community college district shall coordinate the development and curation of open educational resources with existing open educational resources initiatives and degree efforts. In addition, the community college district shall develop and curate open educational resources for coursework to be used for one or more of the following program pathways:(A) An existing associate degree or career technical education certificate program, prioritizing existing associate degrees for transfer.(B) A new associate degree or career technical education certificate program that meets one of the following conditions:(i) Has high value in the regional market.(ii) Meets an emerging regional business industry need.(iii) Has high textbook costs.(3) In complying with paragraph (2), to the extent possible, prioritize the adaptation of existing open educational resources for coursework through existing open educational resources initiatives, or elsewhere, before creating new content.(4) Ensure compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act (Public Law 104-197) and the federal Copyright Act of 1976 (Public Law 94-553).(5) Ensure all open educational resources developed pursuant to this subdivision is added to the California Digital Open Source Library established in Section 66408.(6) Provide the chancellor with all required report data and any planning, progress, and outcome information associated with the grant.(7) (A) Consult with the local academic senate of a community college that would use open educational resources.(B) Grant recipients may use funds to obtain professional development and technical assistance to assist in the development and curation of open educational resources for coursework.(8) Strive to complete development and curation of open educational resources for coursework within two academic years of receiving funding, or sooner, as determined by the chancellor’s office.(g) (1) The chancellor shall, by June 30, 2027, report to the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance on the development and implementation of degrees pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d), and the development and curation of open educational resources pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f), including, but not limited to:(A) The number of degrees developed and implemented and open educational resources developed and curated within each district, disaggregated by college. Degrees shall also be disaggregated by the number of degrees that eliminated textbook costs and the number of degrees that significantly lowered textbook costs.(B) The estimated annual savings to students.(C) The number of students who completed a zero-textbook-cost degree program and accessed open educational resources.(D) Recommendations to increase, expand, or improve the offering of degrees and the use of open educational resources.(2) A report pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(h) (1) Of the funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this program, up to 3 percent of the appropriation may be allocated by the chancellor’s office to contract with a community college district to administer this program.(2) The contract between the chancellor’s office and the community college district shall reflect all of the following:(A) The programmatic and administrative responsibilities that will be delegated to the district, including the programmatic requirements identified in subdivisions (c) to (g), inclusive.(B) A requirement that the contracting district provide prebid conferences, either in person or via webinar, for interested grant applicants.(C) Technical assistance to grant applicants and grantees.(3) The contracting community college district may apply for, and receive, a grant to develop and implement a degree and have employees and administrators of the district participate as part of a multimember team approach pursuant to paragraph (11) of subdivision (d). To be eligible to receive a grant, the district shall maintain appropriate and transparent internal controls and processes to ensure that the district’s contracted duties and responsibilities are clearly delineated, identified, and distinguished from the duties and responsibilities conferred upon the district as a grant applicant and recipient.(4) Upon request of the chancellor’s office, the contracted community college district shall provide the chancellor’s office with an update on the status of the development and implementation of each degree within the district and the development and curation of open educational resources within the district.(5) Notwithstanding any other law, a contract between the chancellor’s office and a community college district for purposes of this subdivision is not subject to any competitive bidding requirements of Section 10340 of the Public Contract Code for the limited purpose of administering the program pursuant to this subdivision.(i) Of the funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this program, funds not awarded in a fiscal year for which funds are appropriated may be awarded in the following fiscal year.(j) The chancellor’s office shall award an initial round of grants no later than January 1 of a fiscal year for which the funds are appropriated.(k) The chancellor’s office may allocate any unallocated resources appropriated for purposes of this program, on or after June 30, 2025, to a community college district to contract for the establishment of statewide open educational resources infrastructure, including the curation, storage, and maintenance of open educational resources infrastructure materials.SEC. 6. Section 84321.64 of the Education Code is amended to read:84321.64. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law that governs the regulations adopted by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to disburse funds, the payment of apportionments to community college districts pursuant to Section 84320 shall be adjusted, for the 2024–25 fiscal year, by paragraph (2).(2) For the month of June, two hundred forty-three million six hundred ninety-three thousand dollars ($243,693,000) shall be deferred to July.(b) The sum of two hundred forty-three million six hundred ninety-three thousand dollars ($243,693,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges appropriated as described in subdivision (d) for apportionments to community college districts, for expenditure in the 2025–26 fiscal year to be expended in accordance with the applicable schedules of Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024.(c) (1) The chancellor may adjust the monthly schedule described in subdivision (a) for the 2024–25 fiscal year to increase the amount deferred in the month of June if it ensures a shorter time between a deferred payment and repayment.(2) If adjusting the monthly schedule, the chancellor shall not exceed the total amount of deferred payments described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).(d)For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, two hundred forty-three million six hundred ninety-three thousand dollars ($243,693,000) of the appropriation made by subdivision (b) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.(d) Of the amount described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) to be paid in July 2025, one hundred six million eight hundred ninety thousand dollars ($106,890,000) is appropriated in Schedule (1) of Item 6870-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Ch. 77, Stats. 2025), and one hundred thirty-six million eight hundred three thousand dollars ($136,803,000) is appropriated in Provision 3 of Item 6870-488 of the Budget Act of 2025 (Ch. 5, Stats. 2025).SEC. 7. Section 84750.7 is added to the Education Code, to read:84750.7. Consistent with Sections 21 and Section 22 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, forty-nine million seven hundred thirty-four thousand dollars ($49,734,000) is hereby appropriated from the Public School System Stabilization Account and shall be transferred by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges for allocation for the Student Centered Funding Formula pursuant to Section 84750.4.SEC. 8. Section 88682 of the Education Code is amended to read:88682. (a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Community Colleges recognize the responsibility for supporting programs that enhance educational opportunities for STEM majors, and produce a diverse pool of baccalaureate degree graduates in STEM majors by preparing students for transfer to four-year higher education institutions.(2) It is the intent of this part to encourage community college districts to establish and implement MESA programs at community colleges that are directed at identifying students affected by social, economic, and educational disadvantages, including disproportionately impacted students, increasing the number of eligible MESA program students served, and increasing student success in transferring and completing baccalaureate degree programs in STEM majors at four-year higher education institutions.(3) The Legislature further intends that MESA programs are not viewed as the only means of providing services to socially, economically, and educationally disadvantaged students pursuing STEM majors who are eligible to transfer to four-year higher education institutions, or of meeting-related student and employee diversity objectives.(4) The Legislature further intends that the categorical funding for MESA programs provided in the annual Budget Act for community colleges be used to establish, expand, and develop MESA programs and services for the purpose of enhancing California’s STEM workforce while aiding the state and nation in reducing equity and achievement gaps.(b) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall adopt regulations for the operation of MESA programs at community colleges that align with the programmatic components of MESA programs. The operation of MESA programs and the regulations adopted by the board of governors shall accomplish all of the following goals:(1) Increasing the number of socially, economically, and educationally disadvantaged students pursuing baccalaureate degrees in STEM majors who are eligible to transfer to four-year higher education institutions.(2) Implementing efficient processes and practices and using existing college transfer centers to achieve greater MESA program student transfers to four-year higher education institutions.(3) Implementing strategies to increase the rate at which MESA program students are deemed transfer-ready in STEM majors to four-year higher education institutions.(4) Improving the academic performance of MESA program students.(5) Increasing the leadership skills and raising the educational expectations of MESA program students.(6) Strengthening relationships with educators and prospective employers in business and industry to establish student internships, scholarships, and other career opportunities for MESA program students.(7) Establishing partnerships with University of California and California State University Mathematics, Engineering, Science, Achievement programs and Mathematics, Engineering, Science, Achievement College Preparatory programs, California Alliance for Minority Participation programs, or similar programs in an effort to provide optimal student support services.(8) Implementing strategies to collaborate with campus programs, such as the Student Equity and Achievement Program established in Section 78222 and the Student Success and Support Program established in Article 1 (commencing with Section 78210) of Chapter 2 of Part 48, to leverage additional resources and opportunities for MESA program students and ensure that MESA programs are integrated into campus culture and infrastructure.(c) MESA program support provided by a community college shall supplement, but not supplant, the regular educational programs offered by the college to encourage and support the enrollment of MESA program students who seek a baccalaureate degree in STEM majors at four-year higher education institutions.(d) The governing board of a community college district shall not use any funds received from the state for the operation and administration of MESA programs to supplant existing college resources, programs, or services. The governing board may use MESA program funds to meet the matching requirements to receive federal funds, or funds granted by nonprofit foundations, designated for the same purposes as described in this part.(e) Beginning in the 2026–27 fiscal year, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall reserve no more than 3.5 percent of the funds appropriated for MESA programs on administrative and discretionary costs of supporting MESA programs. The chancellor may allocate these reserved funds, in consultation with the Community College Association of MESA Directors, solely for statewide coordination and enhancement of MESA programs.SEC. 9. Section 21 of Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2025 is amended to read:SEC. 21. (a) For the 2025–26 fiscal year, the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for transfer to Section B of the State School Fund to support emergency financial assistance grants to students attending a community college.(b) (1) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges chancellor’s office shall allocate these funds the funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) to community college districts based on each district’s share of total California Dream Act application (CADAA) filers that also received a Cal Grant systemwide. The Student Aid Commission shall provide the chancellor’s office with the aggregate CADAA data needed to allocate these resources by district.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), at the discretion of the chancellor’s office, the funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) may be reallocated to community college districts to ensure all eligible CADAA filers receive a grant.(c) A community college district shall only provide grants to students who have filed a CADAA.(d) The maximum grant amount awarded to a student pursuant to this section shall be one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) per academic year.(e) (1) The chancellor’s office shall report, on or before December 31, 2026, to the appropriate policy committees and budget subcommittees of the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on the progress of community college districts in awarding grants pursuant to this section to students.(2) The report in paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(A) The allocations made pursuant to this section to each community college district.(B) How allocated funding was spent by each community college district.(C) The total number of community college students awarded grants systemwide.(D) The number of community college students awarded grants, disaggregated by community college district.(E) The average grant amount systemwide.(F) The average grant amount in each community college district.(G) The status of remaining grant funds.(e)(f) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2023–24 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2023–24 fiscal year.(g) For purposes of this section, “chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.SEC. 10. For the 2025–26 fiscal year, funding appropriated in the Budget Act of 2025 in the following items of appropriation shall be available for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund for purposes of distributing those funds to community college districts:(a) Item 6870-105-0001.(b) Item 6870-108-0001.(c) Item 6870-203-0001.SEC. 11. (a) Section 1.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 66023.5 of the Education Code proposed by both this bill and Senate Bill 271. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, but this bill becomes operative first, (2) each bill amends Section 66023.5 of the Education Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Senate Bill 271, in which case Section 66023.5 of the Education Code, as amended by Section 1 of this bill, shall remain operative only until the operative date of January 1, 2026, at which time Section 1.5 of this bill shall become operative.(b) Section 3.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 70022 of the Education Code proposed by both this bill, Assembly Bill 88, and Senate Bill 67. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) this bill and either Assembly Bill 88 or Senate Bill 67 is enacted, or all three bills are enacted, and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, but this bill becomes operative first, (2) the enacted bills amend Section 70022 of the Education Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Assembly Bill 88 and Senate Bill 67, or, if only one of Assembly Bill 88 or Senate Bill 67 is enacted, after that bill is enacted, in which case Section 70022 of the Education Code, as amended by Section 3 of this bill, shall remain operative only until the operative date of January 1, 2026, at which time Section 3.5 of this bill shall become operative.SEC. 12. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 13. This act is a bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution, has been identified as related to the budget in the Budget Bill, and shall take effect immediately.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact statutory changes relating to the Budget Act of 2025.